Hawaii statutes.
§149A-36 Authority to inspect. The
department or any authorized representative or employee of the department may
enter upon any public or private property, according to law at any reasonable
time to examine and inspect application methods and equipment, to examine and
collect samples of plants, soil, and other materials, and to perform any other
duty for the purpose of carrying out and effectuating the purposes of this
chapter. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 126, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next